Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1376.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2201-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:Section 2201-A. Objectives.--The objectives of this article 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 are:(1) to establish a cabinet-level State agency whose jurisdiction, powers and duties specifically concern and are directed to advancing the well-being of Pennsylvania's older citizens;(2) to effect the maximum feasible coordination of, and eliminate duplication in, the Commonwealth's administration of certain Federal and State programs for older Pennsylvanians;(3) to further promote the efficient delivery of certain social and other services to older Pennsylvanians; [and](4) to promote the creation and growth of independent clubs and associations of older Pennsylvanians and related activities which give promise of assisting older persons to maintain lives of independence and dignity; involvement in the social, economic and political affairs of their communities; and dignified and efficient assistance when disabled or impaired[.]; and(5) to protect older adults in this Commonwealth.Section 2. Sections 2203-A and 2207-A of the act are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 2203-A. Powers and Duties in General.-* * *(c) The department may not enter into a contract or other agreement that directly or indirectly limits the oversight power of the department, the General Assembly or the Auditor General in furtherance of protecting older adults in this Commonwealth.(d) The department shall provide appropriate training for each area agency employee as appropriate to each employee's job responsibilities. The respective trainings shall include:(1) Protective services casework training, which shall include the following topics:(i) An overview of abuse, neglect, exploitation and 20260SB1376PN1794 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 abandonment.(ii) Laws and regulations of the Commonwealth relating to abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment of older adults.(iii) Detection of abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment.(iv) Protective services case assessments.(v) Provision of protective services.(vi) Interviewing skills.(vii) The resistant older adult.(viii) Utilization of local resources.(ix) Incompetence or incapacity.(x) Relationships with other agencies.(xi) Confidentiality.(xii) Institutional investigations.(xiii) Service options for victims of abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment.(xiv) Informed consent.(xv) Self-neglect.(xvi) Retaliation.(xvii) Financial exploitation.(xviii) Any other topic that the department deems necessary to protect older adults in this Commonwealth.(2) Protective services investigation, which shall include the following topics:(i) Laws and regulations of the Commonwealth related to investigations and criminal procedures.(ii) The criminal justice system.(iii) Developing the investigative plan.(iv) Investigative techniques.(v) Maintaining control of the interview.20260SB1376PN1794 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) Interviewing reporters.(vii) Interviewing collateral sources.(viii) Interviewing victims.(ix) Observation techniques.(x) Techniques to obtain documentary evidence.(xi) Techniques to gather and preserve physical evidence.(xii) Closing the investigation.(xiii) Presenting testimony in court.(xiv) Coordination with other State agencies.(xv) Financial exploitation.(xvi) Any other topic that the department deems necessary to protect older adults in this Commonwealth.(3) Protective services intake, which shall include the following topics:(i) Interviewing the reporter.(ii) Completion of the report form.(iii) Preliminary case status assessment to determine report categories.(iv) Requirements for referral of the report to the protective services staff.(v) Emergency procedures.(vi) Confidentiality.(vii) Any other topic the department deems necessary to protect older adults in this Commonwealth.(4) Remedial training shall be on any topic in which the area agency did not receive at least eighty-five per centum (85%) on the area agency's latest evaluation under section 2211-A.Section 2207-A. Area Agencies; Powers and Duties.--* * *(e) (1) Each area agency shall meet the following 20260SB1376PN1794 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements for investigations:(i) The investigation of a report categorized as emergency shall be initiated immediately following the referral of the report. A protective services caseworker shall make every attempt to ensure the immediate safety of the older adult and to conduct a face-to-face visit as soon as possible. The agency shall ensure that the face-to-face visit occurs within twenty-four hours after the report is received.(ii) The investigation of a report categorized as priority shall be initiated as soon as possible. The agency shall ensure that reasonable attempts to initiate the investigation are made within twenty-four hours after the report is received. The investigation of a priority report is initiated only by contact with the older adult who is the subject of the report. A protective services caseworker shall make every attempt to visit with the older adult face to face within twenty-four hours.(iii) The investigation of a report categorized as nonpriority shall be initiated in a timely manner but no later than seventy-two hours after receipt of the report. At the discretion of the agency, the initiation of an investigation of a nonpriority report shall include a visit to the older adult who is the subject of the report when details in the report indicate a need to see and talk with the older adult face to face to secure or verify facts essential to the ongoing investigation. The investigation of a report categorized as nonpriority shall include at least one visit to the older adult who is the subject of the report at an appropriate point in the course of the investigation. Every attempt shall be made to visit with the older adult face to face.(iv) The investigation of a report categorized as no need 20260SB1376PN1794 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for protective services shall consist of the protective services caseworker's review of the report categorization. If the caseworker agrees with the initial categorization, appropriate referrals shall be made within seventy-two hours after receipt of the report to the area agency on aging service management system or, if concerning an adult under sixty years of age, to another community agency, if available. If the caseworker does not agree with the initial categorization, the report shall be placed in another category in this subsection and addressed under the applicable provisions for investigating a report in that category.(v) The agency shall make all reasonable efforts to complete an investigation of a report of need for protective services as soon as possible and, in cases of abuse and neglect, no later than twenty days after receipt of the report. The investigation of the report is completed only when the report has been determined to be substantiated or unsubstantiated and, if substantiated, after necessary steps have been taken to reduce an imminent risk to the older adult's person or property.(2) If the requirements under paragraph (1) can not be met following reasonable efforts to gain access to the older adult, the protective services caseworker shall document the efforts made and take action as appropriate and as provided by law and regulation.(f) An area agency may not enter into a contract or other agreement that directly or indirectly limits the oversight power of the department, the General Assembly or the Auditor General in furtherance of protecting older adults in this Commonwealth.(g) Each area agency employee shall receive appropriate training provided by the department. As applicable, the area 20260SB1376PN1794 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency shall ensure that all training including any remedial training is completed in a timely manner.Section 3. Section 2211-A of the act is amended to read:Section 2211-A. Evaluation.--(a) The Department of Aging shall continually review and evaluate the activities of area agencies and the impact and effectiveness of all programs under this act. The department shall ensure that evaluations, including an onsite evaluation, be made annually of all area agency activities and programs. A written report of the findings of the evaluation shall be submitted to the area agency subject to the evaluation and within thirty days shall be available to the public. In all evaluations, the department shall obtain the views of program beneficiaries concerning strengths and weaknesses of the program. Other departments and agencies of the Commonwealth shall make available to the department information necessary for such evaluations. Annually the department shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a report on its activities including statistical data reflecting services and activities provided older persons during the preceding fiscal year.(b) The department, no less than annually, shall evaluate each county agency in this Commonwealth onsite, which shall include the:(1) Per centum of cases assigned the correct category for reports of need based on the per centum of:(i) investigations initiated within the applicable statutory or regulatory time frame;(ii) comprehensive investigations that were completed and covered all areas of abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment;20260SB1376PN1794 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) case files containing all required documentation necessary to support service decisions and determinations of substantiated or unsubstantiated cases;(iv) eligible cases for which a care plan was completed, documented and presented to the older adult;(v) cases in which assessed risk to the older adult was reduced or eliminated;(vi) the use of appropriated funding from Federal, State and local governments; and(vii) cases in which the area agency determined the case to be classified as no need for further services and the department reversed the determination.(2) The number of cases in which an older adult died during an active investigation, and the area agency's actions during the process.(c) The department, no less than annually, shall evaluate each county agency in this Commonwealth onsite, which shall include the following metrics related to OPTIONS as defined under 6 Pa. Code § 20.2 (relating to definitions), and the primary caregiver support program under section 4 of the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1234, No.204), known as the Pennsylvania Caregiver Support Act:(1) The utilization of best management practices for improving and enhancing the delivery of services.(2) The effectiveness of services provided by the area agency, and whether the agency addressed specific needs for the older adults for which the agency provided services.(3) The effectiveness of coordination, planning and supervising services to ensure that the older adult receives comprehensive and effective care.20260SB1376PN1794 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Whether the older adult has met the criteria necessary to qualify for participation in the OPTIONS and primary caregiver support program.(5) Compliance with established protocols for billing, provider payment models and use of revenue from any collected fees.(6) Usage of appropriated funding from Federal, State and local governments.(d) The department shall issue a score for each metric under subsections (b) and (c). An area agency must achieve a score of no less than eighty-five per centum (85%) in each category to be compliant for the agency's evaluation pursuant to this section. The following shall apply:(1) For an area agency that is compliant, the department shall:(i) Annually audit no less than twenty-five per centum (25%) of alleged older adult abuse cases that an area agency classified as no need for further services.(ii) Annually audit no less than twenty-five per centum (25%) of cases that an area agency had an active investigation when the older adult died.(iii) Monitor the area agency to ensure compliance with all applicable provisions of law.(iv) Gather stakeholder feedback from victims, older adults, caregivers and agencies to identify service gaps.(v) Timely address incidents of statutory or regulatory violations discovered during reviews and provide technical assistance as needed until the area agency is compliant.(2) An area agency that receives a score of no less than seventy-five per centum (75%) in any category and was not 20260SB1376PN1794 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determined to be compliant under this subsection shall be in remedial status. For an agency in remedial status, the department shall:(i) Annually audit no less than fifty per centum (50%) of alleged older adult abuse cases that an area agency classified as no need for further services.(ii) Annually audit no less than fifty per centum (50%) of cases that an area agency had an active investigation when the older adult died.(iii) Monitor the area agency to ensure compliance with all applicable provisions of law.(iv) In collaboration with the area agency, develop a remedial improvement plan, which shall be made available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website within thirty days of development, to return to compliance.(v) Provide appropriate training to staff of the area agency to improve compliance.(vi) Timely address incidents of statutory or regulatory violations discovered during reviews and provide technical assistance as needed until the area agency is compliant.(vii) Require the area agency to submit periodic policy-compliance self-assessments with documentation to the department.(viii) Gather stakeholder feedback from victims, older adults, caregivers and agencies to identify service gaps.(ix) Require bimonthly follow-up meetings with area agency leadership until full compliance is demonstrated.(x) Evaluate the area agency within six months following the development of a remedial improvement plan.(3) An area agency that received a score of less than 20260SB1376PN1794 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 seventy-five per centum (75%) in any category and was not determined to be compliant or remedial under this subsection shall be noncompliant. For a noncompliant area agency, the department shall:(i) Annually audit no less than seventy-five per centum (75%) of alleged older adult abuse cases that an area agency classified as no need for further services.(ii) Annually audit no less than seventy-five per centum (75%) of cases that an area agency had an active investigation when the older adult died.(iii) Monitor the area agency to ensure compliance with all applicable provisions of law.(iv) In collaboration with the area agency, develop a noncompliant improvement plan, which shall be made available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website within thirty days of development.(v) Provide appropriate training to staff of the area agency to improve compliance.(vi) Timely address incidents of statutory or regulatory violations discovered during reviews and provide technical assistance as needed until the area agency is compliant.(vii) Require the area agency to submit monthly policy-compliance self-assessments with documentation to the department.(viii) Gather stakeholder feedback from victims, older adults, caregivers and agencies to identify service gaps.(ix) Establish an improvement working group with area agency and department staff to identify steps to have the area agency be compliant in future evaluations, thus protecting older adults.20260SB1376PN1794 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (x) Require monthly meetings with area agency leadership until full compliance is demonstrated.(xi) Reevaluate the area agency within ninety days following the development of the noncompliant improvement plan.(e) The department shall, no less than annually, complete a full financial audit of each area agency. The audit shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(f) The Auditor General shall audit an area agency and the department, as far as may be necessary to satisfy the Auditor General, that the area agency and the department are complying with the provisions of this article and the act of November 6, 1987 (P.L.381, No.79), known as the "Older Adults Protective Services Act," or other relevant statute or regulation. The Auditor General shall have access to any information or record necessary to complete the audit in this subsection. Each audit shall include an evaluation of the area agency and department's performance of duties as it relates to the classification as no need for further services and the cases in which an older adult died during an active investigation. The Auditor General shall furnish audits no less than biannually. The audits shall be posted on the Auditor General's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require the public disclosure of personal information related to an older adult in this Commonwealth.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1376PN1794 - 12 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526